Tennessee statutes. Title 21 Proceedings In Chancery
Part 5

Transfer of Cases

21-1-501. Incompetency of judge.

In all cases in equity, if the judge is a party, is directly interested in the suit, is connected by blood or affinity within the prohibited degrees with any person so interested or is incompetent as having been of counsel, the venue may be changed to the nearest chancery court, as the case may be, not liable to the like exception, as of course, at the instance of either party, without costs, unless the term at which the application is made, being a trial term, the cause shall be heard and disposed of by a judge not liable to the like exception, sitting specially or by interchange.

Code 1858, § 2842; Shan., § 4556; mod. Code 1932, § 8689; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-401.

Cross-References. Interchange of judges, § 17-2-202.

Transfer to another county by consent, § 16-11-201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Venue, § 6.

Collateral References. 46 Am. Jur. 2d Judges §§ 52-82; 77 Am. Jur. 2d Venue § 61.

48 C.J.S. Judges § 73.

Disqualification of original trial judge to sit on retrial after reversal or mistrial. 60 A.L.R.3d 176.

Dissolution of marriage as affecting disqualifying relationship by affinity in case of judge. 117 A.L.R. 800.

Modification of decree of divorce, statute providing for change of judge on ground of bias or prejudice as applicable to proceedings for. 143 A.L.R. 411.

Relationship of judge to one who is party in an official or representative capacity as disqualification. 10 A.L.R.2d 1307.

Venue
2.

21-1-502. Suits related to actions in other courts.

The chancery court in which any suit or proceeding is brought in which the complainant seeks relief predicated upon, closely related to or growing out of matters or things theretofore adjudicated by final judgment or decree of the circuit or any other court, whether or not the circuit or other court retained jurisdiction of the cause for the purpose of enforcing or modifying the final judgment or decree, in the sound discretion of the judge or chancellor of the chancery court, either sua sponte, or upon motion of any defendant, may transfer the suit or proceeding to the court in which such matters or things were theretofore finally adjudicated; provided, that the circuit or other court shall have jurisdiction of the suit or proceeding concurrent with the chancery court; and provided further, that it shall be made to appear to the chancery court that the transfer of the suit or proceeding to the circuit or other court will not cause unnecessary hardship or inconvenience to the parties to the suit or proceeding, their counsel or witnesses, or unreasonable delay in the final hearing or disposition of the suit or proceeding.

Acts 1953, ch. 155, § 1 (Williams, § 10604.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-402.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, §§ 28, 29, 31.

Collateral References. 27 Am. Jur. 2d Equity § 177.